Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2415
Subagent, defined.

Subagent shall mean a designated broker, together with his or her affiliated licensees, engaged by another designated broker to act as a limited agent for a client. A subagent owes the same obligations and responsibilities to the client pursuant to section 76-2417 or 76-2418 as does the client's primary designated broker.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 15.